North Dakota, session 69, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Term limits - Calculation of years of service .
The time for calculating the years of service for members of the legislative assembly under
section 1 of article XV of the Constitution of North Dakota does not begin to run until the date on
which an individual is first elected or appointed to serve as a member of the legislative
assembly after November 7, 2022 .
Page No. 1 25.0382.02000